Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 1
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE - STATE AUDITOR

2-3-101. Legislative audit committee - membership - meetings - powers and duties.

There is hereby created a legislative audit committee, referred to in this part 1 as the "committee". The committee consists of four senators, two from each major political party, to be appointed by the president and the minority leader of the senate, respectively, with the approval of a majority of the members elected to the senate and four representatives, two from each major political party, to be appointed by the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives, respectively, with the approval of a majority of the members elected to the house of representatives. Appointments to the committee shall be made no later than sixty days after the convening of the first regular session of the general assembly held in each odd-numbered year. An appointing authority may make an appointment to temporarily replace a current member of the committee appointed by that appointing authority; except that, a temporary appointment does not require approval of a majority of the members elected to the applicable body. Membership on the committee terminates with the appointment of a member's successor or upon the termination of a member's term of office in the general assembly, whichever occurs first, and any member may be appointed to succeed himself or herself on the committee. Vacancies in the committee's membership shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments; except that the approval of the members elected to the general assembly is not necessary if any such appointment is made when the general assembly is not in session.

The committee shall select its chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership, and it shall prescribe its own rules of procedure. The committee may appoint subcommittees from the membership of the general assembly and other persons to assist the committee in carrying out its functions. The committee may meet as often as may be necessary to perform its functions, but it shall meet at least once in each quarter of the calendar year.

It is the function of the committee:

To examine persons applying for the position of state auditor as to qualifications and ability but without regard to political affiliation and, after consultation with the executive committee, to place the names of the most qualified candidates in nomination before the general assembly for the position of state auditor;

To review the activities and reports of the state auditor relating to postaudits of the financial transactions and accounts of all departments, institutions, and agencies of the state government and of other public agencies and to submit its recommendations thereon to the general assembly, the governor, and other interested officials at such times as the committee considers necessary;

To keep minutes of its meetings which shall be available to all members of the general assembly upon request and to allow any member of the general assembly to attend any of the meetings of the committee and to present his views on any subject which the committee may be considering;

To conduct such other activities as may be required by law or by joint resolution of the general assembly;

Upon receipt of the investigation report as provided in section 24-50.5-106, C.R.S., to direct the state auditor to conduct a preliminary investigation to determine the need for a fiscal audit, performance audit, or management study of the matter set forth in such report. Upon receipt of the preliminary report from the state auditor, the committee may direct an immediate special audit or management study of the matter or may provide that such study shall be done in accordance with the scheduled audit of the agency cited in such report. Upon completion of any special audit or management study pursuant to this paragraph (e), the committee shall submit its findings to the governor and the members of the general assembly.

To review enterprise designations of auxiliary facilities or groups of auxiliary facilities which are submitted to the office of the state auditor pursuant to the provisions of section 23-5-101.5, C.R.S., to ensure that such designations conform to the requirements of section 23-5-101.5, C.R.S., and to the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, to determine which, if any designations, shall be allowed to expire pursuant to section 23-5-101.5, C.R.S., and to recommend to the general assembly such legislation regarding such designations as may be necessary;

To review any enterprise designation of the student loan division that is submitted to the office of the state auditor pursuant to the provisions of section 23-3.1-103.5, C.R.S., to ensure that the designation conforms to the requirements of section 23-3.1-103.5, C.R.S., and to the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, to determine whether the designation shall be allowed to expire pursuant to section 23-3.1-103.5, C.R.S., and to recommend to the general assembly such legislation regarding the designation as may be necessary; and

To review the activities and reports of the state auditor related to performance audits he or she is required to conduct or cause to be conducted pursuant to section 2-3-103 (9).

Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses in connection with the performance of their duties and shall be paid the same per diem as other members of interim committees in attendance at meetings.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 152, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-1.

L. 79:

(3)(c) and (3)(d) amended and (3)(e) added, p. 967, § 2, effective June 15.

L. 81:

(3)(b) amended, p. 339, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 88:

(3)(a) amended, p. 305, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 93:

(3)(d) and (3)(e) amended and (3)(f) added, p. 1826, § 9, effective June 6; (3)(a) amended, p. 2107, § 6, effective June 9.

L. 94:

(3)(e) and (3)(f) amended and (3)(g) added, p. 99, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 2010:

(3)(h) added, (HB 10-1119), ch. 340, p. 1572, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-156), ch. 282, p. 1154, § 1, effective June 10.

Cross references:

(1) For necessary expenses and per diem allowances to committee members, see § 2-2-307.

(2) In 2010, subsection (3)(h) was added by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 340, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

2-3-102. State auditor - qualifications and appointment - term of office.

The state auditor must be a certified public accountant licensed to practice in this state. The state auditor shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation by a majority vote of the members elected to and serving in each house of the general assembly to serve for a term of five years and until a successor is appointed and qualified with the first such term beginning on July 1, 1966. If a vacancy occurs in the position of state auditor, the committee may designate a temporary state auditor who shall exercise and perform all of the powers and duties that are by law to be exercised and performed by the state auditor until a replacement is appointed by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 153, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-2.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 255, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1382, § 1, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the appointment of the state auditor, see § 49 of art. V, Colo. Const.

2-3-103. Duties of state auditor - definition.

It is the duty of the state auditor to conduct or cause to be conducted postaudits of all financial transactions and accounts kept by or for all departments, institutions, and agencies of the state government, including educational institutions, and the judicial and legislative branches, to conduct performance postaudits thereof, and to perform similar or related duties with respect to such political subdivisions of the state as may be required by law. Postaudits of all financial transactions and accounts may be conducted on a biennial basis.

The state auditor shall have the authority to conduct or cause to be conducted postaudits of all financial transactions and accounts kept by or for any special purpose authority as defined in section 24-77-102 (15), C.R.S., or any state entity designated as an enterprise as defined in section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution, including performance postaudits thereof, except for:

Any special purpose authority or state entity whose governing body includes the state auditor as an ex officio member;

Any hospital that is subject to audit under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S., or medicare, Title XVIII of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended; or

Any special purpose authority or state entity where the authority's or entity's actions are subject to a performance audit, or such similar audit, by the federal government. Upon completion of such a federal performance audit, a copy of the audit shall be shared with the state auditor.

(1.5) (a) In addition to any other duties granted by law, the state auditor may assess, confirm, and report on the security practices of all of the information technology systems maintained or administered by all departments, institutions, and agencies of state government, including educational institutions and the judicial and legislative branches. The state auditor may perform similar or related duties with respect to political subdivisions of the state where the state auditor has been granted authority to perform financial or performance audits with respect to such political subdivisions. In order to perform such duties, the state auditor may conduct penetration or similar testing of computer networks or information systems of the state or a political subdivision, as applicable, assess network or information system vulnerability, or conduct similar or related procedures to promote best practices with respect to the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of information systems technology as the state auditor deems necessary in his or her discretion. In conducting such testing, the state auditor may contract with auditors or information technology security specialists, or both, who possess the necessary specialized knowledge and experience to perform the required work. The authority of the state auditor pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (1.5) are coextensive with the state auditor's authority under this part 1.

Any testing or assessment of security practices and procedures concerning information technology in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) shall be conducted or caused to be conducted by the state auditor:

After consultation and in coordination with, but not requiring the approval of, the chief information officer appointed pursuant to section 24-37.5-103, C.R.S., or any person performing comparable duties for either a state agency that is not under the jurisdiction of the office of information technology created in section 24-37.5-103, C.R.S., or a political subdivision of the state;

In accordance with industry standards prescribed by the national institute of standards and technology or any successor agency; and

After the state auditor and any other person with whom the state auditor is required to consult in accordance with the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) have agreed in writing to rules governing the manner in which the testing or assessment is to be conducted, including a mitigation plan for handling significant system outages or disruptions in the event they occur.

The state auditor shall prepare for the committee reports and recommendations on the postaudits conducted, and, under the direction of the committee, shall prepare an annual report to contain, among other things, copies of or the substance of audit reports on the various departments, institutions, and agencies as well as a summary of recommendations made in regard thereto. All reports must be open to public inspection except for that portion of any report containing recommendations, comments, and any narrative statements which is released only upon the approval of a majority vote of the committee.

The state auditor shall keep a complete and accurate set of records on the fiscal transactions of the state auditor's office, and shall also keep a complete file of copies of all audit reports, including work papers, and copies of examinations, investigations, and any other reports or materials issued by the state auditor, the state auditor's staff, or by the committee. The work papers of the office of the state auditor shall be open to public inspection only upon approval of a majority of the members of the committee. Only the specific work papers that the committee votes to approve for disclosure shall be open to public inspection. Work papers that have not been specifically approved for disclosure by a majority vote of the committee shall remain confidential. Under no circumstances shall the work papers be open to public inspection prior to the completed report being filed with the committee.

All expenses incurred by the office of the state auditor, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon vouchers signed by the chairman of the committee and drawn on funds appropriated for legislative expenses and allocated to the office of the state auditor; except that any payroll voucher or any other voucher which does not exceed one thousand dollars may be signed by the state auditor or by the state auditor's authorized designee.

It is the duty of the state auditor to annually evaluate the investments of the public school fund and report to the committee any loss of principal of such fund that, in the state auditor's judgment, exists.

Repealed.

Upon a determination by the state auditor that the provisions of section 20-1-112, C.R.S., have not been met, the state auditor shall cause to be conducted a postaudit of any noncomplying office of district attorney. The expenses of such a postaudit shall be borne by the office of district attorney.

The state auditor shall review or cause to be reviewed all enterprise designations submitted to the office of the state auditor pursuant to the provisions of sections 23-3.1-103.5 and 23-5-101.5, C.R.S., to ensure that such designations conform to the requirements of section 23-3.1-103.5 or 23-5-101.5, C.R.S., whichever is applicable, and to the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution. In addition, the state auditor shall recommend to the legislative audit committee those designations, if any, which, in the opinion of the state auditor, should be allowed to expire and shall otherwise assist the legislative audit committee in reviewing the enterprise designations submitted to the office of the state auditor.

It is the duty of the state auditor to conduct or cause to be conducted performance audits as specified in section 2-7-204 (5).

(9.5) It is the duty of the state auditor to notify the appropriate joint committee of reference as determined pursuant to section 2-7-203 when a department has not completed recommendations made by the state auditor within the time provided.

(9.7) It is the duty of the state auditor to establish and administer the fraud hotline as specified in section 2-3-110.5.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Information technology" shall have the same meaning as specified in section 24-37.5-102 (12).

Source:

L. 65:

p. 154, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-3.

L. 69:

p. 94, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 670, § 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1056, § 5, effective May 18.

L. 81:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 340, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 83:

(6) added, p. 375, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 401, § 1, effective March 20; (6) repealed, p. 937, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(7) added, p. 945, § 1, effective April 4; (2) amended, p. 332, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 14, § 1, effective March 2; (8) added, p. 1826, § 10, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(8) amended, p. 100, § 2, effective March 18.

L. 2010:

(9) added, (HB 10-1119), ch. 340, p. 1572, § 5, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-115), ch. 114, p. 359, § 1, effective April 13; (1.5) and (10) added, (SB 11-082), ch. 109, p. 338, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(9) amended and (9.5) added, (HB 13-1299), ch. 382, p. 2242, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(a), (2), (4), and (5) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1382, § 2, effective May 25; (9.7) added, (HB 17-1223), ch. 243, p. 1004, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(10)(a) amended, (HB 21-1236), ch. 211, p. 1115, § 15, effective September 7.

Cross references:

In 2010, subsection (9) was added by the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 340, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

2-3-103.5. Deputies.

The state auditor, with the approval of the committee, may appoint one or more deputy state auditors, not to exceed three in number, pursuant to section 2-3-104. In the case of the temporary absence or incapacity of the state auditor, the committee may designate a deputy to exercise and perform all or any portion of the powers and duties of the state auditor which are by law exercised and performed by the state auditor, and, unless and until such designation is made by the committee, the state auditor may so designate such deputy.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 255, § 2, effective May 18.

2-3-103.7. Disclosure of reports before filing.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Any state employee or other individual acting in an oversight role as a member of a committee, board, or commission, or any employee or other individual acting in an oversight role with respect to any audit conducted pursuant to sections 2-3-120, 2-3-127, 10-22-105 (4)(c), and 25.5-10-209 (4), who willfully and knowingly discloses the contents of any report prepared by or at the direction of the state auditor's office prior to the release of such report by a majority vote of the committee as provided in section 2-3-103 (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Any state employee or other individual acting in an oversight role as a member of a committee, board, or commission, or any employee or other individual acting in an oversight role with respect to any audit conducted pursuant to sections 2-3-120, 2-3-127, 10-22-105 (4)(c), and 25.5-6-1708 (1), who willfully and knowingly discloses the contents of any report prepared by or at the direction of the state auditor's office prior to the release of such report by a majority vote of the committee as provided in section 2-3-103 (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

This section shall not apply to necessary communication of employees of the state auditor's office or employees of any person contracting to provide services for the state auditor's office with those persons necessary to complete the audit report or with other state agencies involved with comparable reports.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 296, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 332, § 2, effective April 7.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1136), ch. 26, p. 86, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1294), ch. 414, p. 2764, § 2, effective July 2; (1) amended, (HB 21-1249), ch. 178, p. 970, § 2, effective September 7; (1) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 323, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by HB 21-1249 and HB 21-1294 were harmonized and, effective July 1, 2024, amendments to subsection (1) by HB 21-1187 will be harmonized.

2-3-104. Salary and staff of state auditor.

The state auditor shall be paid a salary to be determined by the executive committee, as provided in section 2-3-303 (3). The state auditor, with the approval of the committee, may appoint such additional professional, technical, clerical, or other employees or contract for such services necessary to perform the functions assigned to the state auditor. No more than three members of the staff of the state auditor shall be exempt from the state personnel system.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 154, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-4.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 305, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2107, § 7, effective June 9.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1624, § 10, effective May 31.

2-3-104.5. Legal representation of the state auditor.

The duty of providing legal representation or otherwise rendering legal services to the state auditor in connection with the auditor's performance of his or her functions and duties under this part 1 is shared between the office of legislative legal services created in section 2-3-501 and the attorney general. The attorney general is limited to providing legal advice and representation to the auditor in connection with litigation matters, issues related to financial or performance postaudits conducted by the state auditor, and issues related to the administration of the fraud hotline created in section 2-3-110.5.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-063), ch. 12, p. 56, § 12, effective September 14.

2-3-105. Transfer of employees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 65:

p. 154, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-5.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 342, § 9, effective March 27.

2-3-106. Bond. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 65:

p. 155, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-6.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 342, § 9, effective March 27.

2-3-107. Authority to subpoena witnesses - access to records.

For the purposes of this part 1 the committee has the power to subpoena witnesses, take testimony under oath, and to assemble records and documents, by subpoena duces tecum or otherwise, with the same power and authority as courts of record and may apply to courts of record for the enforcement of these powers. The sheriff of any county shall serve any subpoena on written order of the committee in the same manner as process is served in civil actions. Witnesses subpoenaed to appear before the committee shall receive the same fees and expenses as witnesses in civil cases.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion of subsection (2)(a)(I) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state auditor or his or her designated representative is authorized to have access at all times, except as provided by sections 39-1-116, 39-4-103, and 39-5-120, to all of the books, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other records or information in any department, institution, or agency, including but not limited to records or information required to be kept confidential or exempt from public disclosure upon subpoena, search warrant, discovery proceedings, or otherwise. The authority of the state auditor or his or her designated representative to access at all times the books, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other records or information in accordance with this subsection (2)(a) also extends to any fiscal or performance audit the state auditor or his or her designated representative conducts of:

The Colorado new energy improvement district and the new energy improvement program in connection with section 2-3-120;

Repealed.

The health benefit exchange created in section 10-22-104 in accordance with section 10-22-105 (4)(c);

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a)(I)(D) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Community-centered boards in accordance with section 25.5-10-209 (4);

(D)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a)(I)(D) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Community-centered boards, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702 (5);

[Editor's note: This subsection (2)(a)(I)(E) is effective July 1, 2024.] Case management agencies in accordance with section 25.5-6-1708 (1); and

The statewide implementation of the statewide system of standards and assessments and the statewide education accountability system in accordance with section 2-3-127; except that, for purposes of said audit, the state auditor or his or her designated representative shall not have access to the financial records, including books, accounts, and vouchers, of a public school, school district, or board of cooperative services or of the state charter school institute.

The authority of the state auditor or his or her designated representative to access at all times the books, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other records or information provided under subsection (2)(a)(I)(B) of this section terminates on the date the final audit report is released by the legislative audit committee.

When accessing confidential health records, the state auditor shall determine the necessity of accessing personal identifying health information for the purpose of achieving the audit objectives.

(2)

(a) (I) [Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion of subsection (2)(a)(I) is effective July 1, 2024.] Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state auditor or the state auditor's designated representative is authorized to have access at all times, except as provided by sections 39-1-116, 39-4-103, and 39-5-120, to all of the books, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other records or information in any department, institution, or agency, including but not limited to records or information required to be kept confidential or exempt from public disclosure upon subpoena, search warrant, discovery proceedings, or otherwise. The authority of the state auditor or the state auditor's designated representative to access at all times the books, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other records or information in accordance with this subsection (2)(a) also extends to any fiscal or performance audit the state auditor or the state auditor's designated representative conducts of:

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed as authorizing or permitting the publication of information prohibited by law. Notwithstanding the approval of the committee to release work papers of the office of the state auditor pursuant to section 2-3-103 (3), no information required to be kept confidential pursuant to any other law shall be released in connection with an audit. The results of any audit or evaluation of information technology systems undertaken pursuant to section 2-3-103 (1.5) that are precluded from disclosure under section 24-6-402 (3)(a)(IV), C.R.S., shall not be released in connection with any such audit or evaluation. In addition to the penalty established in section 2-3-103.7, any person who unlawfully releases confidential information shall be subject to any criminal or civil penalty under any applicable law for the unlawful release of the information.

Any officer or employee who fails or refuses to permit such access or examination for audit or who interferes in any way with such examination commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

In verifying any of the audits made, the state auditor has the right to ascertain the amounts on deposit in any bank or other depository belonging to any department, institution, or agency required to be audited and has the right to audit said account on the books of any such bank or depository. No bank or other depository is liable for making available to the state auditor any of the information required under this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 65:

p. 155, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-7.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1195, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2011:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 11-082), ch. 109, p. 339, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1383, § 3, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 19-1136), ch. 26, p. 86, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

IP(2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(I)(C), and (2)(a)(I)(D) amended and (2)(a)(I)(F) added, (HB 21-1294), ch. 414, p. 2764, § 3, effective July 2; (2)(a)(I)(B) repealed, (HB 21-1249), ch. 178, p. 970, § 3, effective September 7; (2)(c) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3132, § 52, effective March 1, 2022; IP(2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(I)(D) amended and (2)(a)(I)(E) added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 323, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsections IP(2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(I)(D) by HB 21-1187 and HB 21-1294 were harmonized, effective July 1, 2024.

Cross references:

For fees and expenses of witnesses in civil cases, see §§ 13-33-102 and 13-33-103; for the authority of legislative council to compel attendance of witnesses and procedure therefor, see § 2-3-306; for the authority of the general assembly to compel attendance of witnesses, see § 2-2-313.

2-3-108. Special audits.

Any member of the general assembly or the governor may request the committee to direct a special audit of any department, institution, or agency, and, upon the vote of the majority of the committee approving such request, the state auditor shall make or cause to be made such audit.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 156, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-8.

2-3-109. Emergency reports.

If the state auditor finds in the course of an audit evidence of improper practices of financial administration or inadequacy of fiscal records, the state auditor shall report the same immediately to the committee. With the approval of the committee, the state auditor shall also report the same to the governor and the head of any department, institution, or agency affected thereby.

If the state auditor in the course of an audit finds evidence of apparently illegal transactions or misuse or embezzlement of public funds or property, the state auditor shall immediately report such transactions to the committee; moreover, with the approval of the committee, the state auditor may file a written copy of the report with the governor but shall give notice thereof to the district attorney of the district wherein such transactions are reported to have taken place.

If the state auditor in the course of an audit finds evidence of apparently false claims related to public funds or property, the state auditor shall immediately report such transactions to the committee and shall file a written copy of the report with the attorney general.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 156, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-9.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 340, § 2, effective March 27.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1383, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(3) added, (HB 22-1119), ch. 394, p. 2797, § 3, effective August 10.

2-3-110. Reimbursement of state auditor for certain audits - disclosure.

When the state auditor is required by law or the state constitution to audit or cause to be audited a state department, institution, or agency or other governmental or organizational entity for self-supporting or nonappropriated activities, including but not limited to enterprises as defined in section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution, associated students' accounts, auxiliary enterprise funds, nonprofit corporations, trust funds, contracts with the federal government, federal grants-in-aid, or federal assistance programs, moneys from the state general fund shall not be used to pay for the cost of the audit, and the state auditor shall be reimbursed for the audit services by the entity for which the audit is in whole or in part performed.

The reimbursement amount from such entity shall be a pro rata share of the total state auditor's cost, based upon a time-spent factor, if the total audit of the entity includes the audit of state-appropriated funds. If state-appropriated funds are not involved in such audits, the reimbursement shall be not less than the average hourly cost of the operations of the state auditor's office nor more than the average rate attainable from certified public accounting firms performing similar services for this state. Reimbursement charges may be negotiated with the state auditor's office within the above limitations.

The state auditor shall disclose the amount of fully reimbursed audit services in the annual financial statements of the legislative department.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 111, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 3-21-11.

L. 2005:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1516, § 2, effective May 5.

Cross references:

For the state auditor's duties, see § 49 of art. V, Colo. Const.